Tennessee statutes. Title 3 Legislature
Chapter 17 Tennessee Nonprofit Gaming Law
3-17-104. Annual event application — Requirements.

Except as otherwise provided in § 3-17-103(a)(1), all annual event applications shall be submitted to the secretary from July 1 to January 31 for the annual event period beginning July 1 following the close of the application period and ending June 30 of the subsequent calendar year.

The secretary of state may prescribe and furnish forms and filing methods for all filings required by this part.

An initial application fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) must be paid at the time of submission of an annual event application. An annual event application must not be accepted by the secretary unless accompanied by the initial application fee.

The secretary shall collect a reasonable fee for annual event applications. The secretary may establish a fee schedule for annual event applications based on the gross revenue of the annual event. No fee shall exceed seven hundred dollars ($700). Funds collected under this chapter shall be used by the secretary and the Tennessee bureau of investigation to defray the cost of administering this chapter, including, but not limited to, the cost of investigations pursuant to § 3-17-113.

Annual event application fees are nonrefundable.

All annual event applications shall be signed by the nonprofit organization's chair, president or chief administrative officer and the preparer of the application. Such persons shall certify under oath and subject to criminal penalties, including perjury, that the information contained in the annual event application is true and accurate.

A nonprofit organization filing an annual event application shall submit, on a form prescribed by the secretary, the following information:

The name, mailing address and physical address of the nonprofit organization. If the organization has multiple chapters or affiliates in Tennessee operating under the same tax exemption, the organization shall submit the physical addresses and mailing addresses of such multiple locations; provided that, for the purposes of this chapter, a post office box, or similar address at a mail or package delivery service, shall not be considered a physical address. If the principal office of the nonprofit organization is outside Tennessee, the organization shall submit the physical address and mailing address of such principal location;

The name of the event;

The date of the event;

The location of the event;

A description of the type of lottery game to be conducted. Such description shall include the estimated number of tickets, shares, chances or other similar records to be offered and the actual dollar amount at which a ticket, share, chance or other similar record shall be sold; provided that, if tickets, shares, chances or other similar records are to be sold at different value levels or tiers, then the actual dollar amounts and structure of such value levels or tiers;

A description of the charitable use of the proceeds from the event;

The name and telephone number of a contact person for the event;

A copy of the organization's determination letter from the internal revenue service showing that the organization is exempt from federal income taxation under § 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code as an organization described in § 501(c)(3) or § 501(c)(19) of the Internal Revenue Code;

A copy of the nonprofit organization's last annual report, Form 990, filed with the internal revenue service and any attached schedules for the organization's tax year ending immediately preceding the annual event application;

If the organization has not filed an annual report with the internal revenue service for the organization's tax year ending immediately preceding the annual event application, the organization shall submit an affidavit from the nonprofit organization's chair, president or administrative officer affirming that the organization has not filed an annual report and shall begin to file annual reports as required by this chapter; provided, that the organization may submit such affidavit only one (1) time;

An organization shall not be required to comply with this subdivision (e)(9) if it is not required to file a Form 990 with the internal revenue service; provided, that the organization submits proof of such determination by the internal revenue service;

The names and addresses of any officers, directors, trustees, and the principal salaried executive staff officer of the nonprofit organization;

A sworn statement that the organization has been in continuous and active existence as a nonprofit organization located in Tennessee as defined by § 3-17-102;

A sworn statement that no officer, director, trustee, or the principal salaried executive staff officer of the nonprofit organization has been convicted of a violation of § 39-14-103, § 39-14-104, § 39-14-105, § 39-16-702, § 39-16-703, title 39, chapter 17, parts 5 or 6, or a similar offense in another jurisdiction; and

A sworn statement that the board, or functional equivalent, of the nonprofit organization has approved the filing of an annual event application and intends to operate an annual event if authorized by the general assembly.

Acts 2004, ch. 476, § 2; 2004, ch. 620, §§ 4-7; 2004, ch. 890, § 2; 2005, ch. 207, §§ 9-14; 2006, ch. 508, §§ 4-6; 2007, ch. 18, §§ 9, 10, 15; 2009, ch. 177, § 6; 2012, ch. 747, § 3; 2014, ch. 699, §§ 11-13; 2015, ch. 133, § 4; 2015, ch. 134, §§ 7-15; 2018, ch. 584, § 4; 2020, ch. 517, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 476, § 13 provided that the provisions of the act shall not be construed to be an appropriation of funds and no funds shall be obligated or expended pursuant to the act unless such funds are specifically appropriated by the general appropriations act.

Acts 2014, ch. 699, § 28 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to annual event applications submitted, and annual events authorized, on and after July 1, 2014.

Acts 2014, ch. 699, § 27 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall not be construed as rescinding authorization, prohibiting or otherwise altering the requirements for annual events authorized by the One Hundred Eighth General Assembly for the annual event period beginning July 1, 2013, and ending June 30, 2014, and the annual event period beginning July 1, 2014, and ending June 30, 2015.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment rewrote this section.

The 2015 amendment by ch. 133, added “Except as otherwise provided in §3-17-103(a)(1),” at the beginning of (a).

The 2015 amendment by ch. 134, substituted “nonprofit” for “501(c)(3)” throughout the section; substituted “nonprofit organization” for “501(c)(3) organization” throughout the section; inserted “or § 501(c)(19)” in (e)(8); substituted “any officers” for “the officers” in (e)(10); substituted “§3-17-102” for “§3-17-102(1)” at the end of (e)(11); and substituted “, or functional equivalent, of the nonprofit organization” for “of the organization” in (e)(13).

The 2018 amendment in (c)(1), substituted “An initial application fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) must be paid” for “An application fee shall be paid” at the beginning of the first sentence, and, in the second sentence, substituted “An annual event application must not be” for “Annual event applications shall not be” at the beginning, and substituted “the initial application fee” for “appropriate application fee” at the end.

The 2020 amendment rewrote (b) which read: “The secretary shall develop a uniform application form for annual event applications. The secretary is encouraged to utilize, to every extent possible, web-based forms and procedures for annual event applications.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 699, § 28. July 1, 2014.

Acts 2015, ch. 133, § 5. April 14, 2015.

Acts 2015, ch. 134, § 28. April 14, 2015.

Acts 2018, ch. 584, § 7. March 20, 2018.

Acts 2020, ch. 517, § 7. February 27, 2020.

Attorney General Opinions. The provisions of T.C.A. §§3-17-102(a)(2), 103(a)(6) and 104(a)(3) do not conflict with the definition of “§ 501(c)(3) organization” as set forth in T.C.A. §3-17-101; the definition applies throughout the statute, OAG 04-072 (4/21/04).

3-17-105. Omnibus list.

The secretary shall examine each annual event application submitted under this chapter for inclusion on the omnibus list. An annual event shall be included on the omnibus list if:

All annual event application filing requirements of § 3-17-104 are met;

The secretary determines that the nonprofit organization has been recognized by the internal revenue service as a tax exempt nonprofit organization and that such exemption is valid at the time of filing an annual event application;

The secretary determines that the organization is a nonprofit organization as defined in § 3-17-102; and

The type of lottery game is authorized by the provisions of this chapter and article XI, § 5 of the Constitution of Tennessee.

The secretary shall establish rules and regulations concerning the acceptance of amendments to annual event applications otherwise consistent with this chapter including, but not limited to, amendments concerning conflicting locations for an annual event.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, an organization may submit a request for a location or date change, regardless of whether such location or date is in actual conflict with another organization, to the secretary no later than twelve o'clock (12:00) noon central standard time (CST) on the fifteenth day of February each year.

The secretary shall include all qualified annual event applicants on an omnibus list to be transmitted to the general assembly pursuant to the provisions of § 3-17-103(b).

Except as provided in subdivision (d)(2)(B), no extension of time shall be granted for submission, or completion, of an annual event application after the application deadline has passed for the appropriate annual event period.

Except as provided in subdivision (d)(2)(B), the secretary shall have no authority to accept, and shall not accept, an annual event application, or an amendment to an annual event application, submitted after the application deadline has passed for the appropriate annual event period as established pursuant to § 3-17-103(a)(1).

For annual event applications submitted by twelve o'clock (12:00) noon central standard time (CST) prior to January 31 each year, the secretary shall notify any organization that would not otherwise be included on the omnibus list of the reason, or reasons, why such organization would not be included. Such notification shall be made by February 15 each year. Any such organization may submit an amended annual event application to the secretary no later than February 25 each year. Any such annual event shall be included on the omnibus list if the amended annual event application complies with this chapter.

An annual event application may be permanently withdrawn prior to the date of transmission of the omnibus list to the general assembly; provided, that once withdrawn, the nonprofit organization may not resubmit an annual event application for the annual event period in which the previously submitted application was withdrawn.

If an annual event application is not included in the omnibus list, the secretary shall transmit notification to the applicant stating the basis for such non-inclusion by close of business on the last day of February.

An applicant whose application is not included in the omnibus list may request in writing that the secretary reconsider the determination; provided, that such written request is filed with the secretary within three (3) calendar days from the date of notification of non-inclusion required by § 3-17-105(f). The secretary shall reconsider such determination and issue a final decision within seven (7) calendar days of receipt of such written request for reconsideration.

[Deleted by 2016 amendment.]

Acts 2004, ch. 476, § 2; 2004, ch. 620, §§ 8, 9; 2004, ch. 890, § 3; 2005, ch. 207, § 15; 2006, ch. 508, § 7; 2009, ch. 177, § 7; 2014, ch. 699, §§ 14-16; 2015, ch. 134, § 16; 2016, ch. 821, §§ 2-5.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 476, § 13 provided that the provisions of the act shall not be construed to be an appropriation of funds and no funds shall be obligated or expended pursuant to the act unless such funds are specifically appropriated by the general appropriations act.

Acts 2014, ch. 699, § 28 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to annual event applications submitted, and annual events authorized, on and after July 1, 2014.

Acts 2014, ch. 699, § 27 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall not be construed as rescinding authorization, prohibiting or otherwise altering the requirements for annual events authorized by the One Hundred Eighth General Assembly for the annual event period beginning July 1, 2013, and ending June 30, 2014, and the annual event period beginning July 1, 2014, and ending June 30, 2015.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment substituted “no later than twelve o'clock (12:00) noon central standard time (CST) on the fifteenth day of February each year” for “no later than twelve o'clock (12:00) noon central daylight time (CDT) on May 10, 2004, and no later than twelve o'clock (12:00) noon central standard time (CST) on the first day in February in any subsequent year” at the end of (b)(2); and, in (d)(2), substituted “§3-17-103(a)(1)” for “§3-17-103(a)(1) or (f)” at the end of (A), and rewrote (B) which read: “For annual event applications submitted by twelve o'clock (12:00) noon central daylight time (CDT) on April 20, 2004, for the annual event period beginning July 1, 2004, and ending June 30, 2005, prior to November 1, 2004, for the annual event period beginning July 1, 2005, and ending June 30, 2006, and prior to January 1 in any subsequent year for subsequent annual event periods, the secretary shall notify any organization that would not otherwise be included on the omnibus list of the reason, or reasons, why such organization would not be included. Such notification shall be made prior to May 10, 2004, and by January 15th in any subsequent year. Any such organization may submit an amended annual event application to the secretary no later than twelve o'clock (12:00) noon central daylight time (CDT) on May 10, 2004, and no later than twelve o'clock (12:00) noon central standard time (CST) on the first day in February in any subsequent year. Any such annual event shall be included on the omnibus list if the amended annual event application complies with this chapter.”

The 2015 amendment substituted “nonprofit” for “501(c)(3)” throughout the section.

The 2016 amendment substituted “no later than February 25 each year” for “no later than twelve o'clock (12:00) noon CST on the last day of February” at the end of the penultimate sentence of (d)(2)(B); in (f), added “by close of business on the last day of February” at the end, and deleted the former second sentence which read: “The secretary shall transmit such notice to the applicant at the primary mailing address listed in such applicant's annual event application.”; in (g), in the first sentence substituted “three (3) calendar days” for “ten (10) calendar days” and added “required by §3-17-105(f)” at the end, and substituted “within seven (7) calendar days” for “within ten (10) calendar days” in the last sentence; and deleted former (h) which read: “(h)(1) Review of final decisions of the secretary shall be heard by the Tennessee claims commission in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the commission. It is the intent of the general assembly that reviews pursuant to this subsection (h) shall be heard on an expedited basis. The venue for any such review shall be in the middle division of the Tennessee claims commission.“(2) A petition for review shall be filed not later than ten (10) calendar days after issuance of the final decision by the secretary. Copies of the petition shall be served upon the secretary and the attorney general and reporter.“(3) The review shall be conducted by the claims commission on the small claims docket pursuant to §9-8-403 and shall be confined to the record of proceedings before the secretary.“(4) The claims commission shall issue written findings of fact and conclusions of law as to whether the secretary's decision was:“(A) Clearly erroneous; or“(B) Arbitrary and capricious. “(5) The claims commission shall have no authority to award monetary damages in any review made pursuant to this section.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 699, § 28. July 1, 2014.

Acts 2015, ch. 134, § 28. April 14, 2015.

Acts 2016, ch. 821, § 8. July 1, 2016.

3-17-106. Financial accounting — Requirements.

An organization authorized by the general assembly to operate an annual event shall file, within ninety (90) calendar days following the actual event date, a financial accounting with the secretary in accordance with this section. An organization shall remit to the secretary the full application fee specified pursuant to § 3-17-104(c)(2), less the initial application fee paid pursuant to § 3-17-104(c)(1) with the submission of the financial accounting. A financial accounting must not be accepted by the secretary unless accompanied by the fees required pursuant to § 3-17-104(c).

An organization that fails to file its financial accounting in accordance with this section may be assessed a late fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each month, or portion thereof, that the accounting is late. The late filing fee shall accompany every late-filed financial accounting. If an organization fails to timely file the required financial accounting in any two (2) of three (3) consecutive annual event periods, the organization may, in the discretion of the secretary, be disqualified from filing future annual event applications, which decision is subject to the review and appeal procedures provided in § 3-17-105(g) and (h).

For events grossing fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or less, the organization shall file a financial accounting, on a form prescribed by the secretary, showing the following:

The gross amount of money received from the annual event;

The amount of money expended by the organization including, for amounts exceeding one hundred dollars ($100), the name and address of the payee, the category of expense, and the amount expended;

The amount of money disbursed, or to be disbursed, to the charitable programs or purposes of the nonprofit organization including, but not limited to, sufficient documentation indicating that all of the gross proceeds, less any amount expended pursuant to § 3-17-103(a)(5)(B), have been used, or have been earmarked, for the purposes or programs described in § 3-17-104(e)(6); and

A list of all prize winners, including their names and addresses, of cash, goods or services valued at more than fifty dollars ($50.00) and the prize received.

For events grossing more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), the organization shall file an audited financial statement prepared by an independent certified public accountant or an independent public accountant, on a form prescribed by the secretary, showing the following:

The gross amount of money received from the proceeds of the annual event;

The amount of money disbursed, or to be disbursed, to the charitable programs or purposes of the nonprofit organization including, but not limited to, sufficient documentation indicating that all of the gross proceeds, less any amount expended pursuant to § 3-17-103(a)(5)(B), have been used, or have been earmarked, for the purposes or programs described in § 3-17-104(e)(6);

An itemized list, including the name and address of the payee, of the amounts spent for all expenses; provided, that individual expenses of one hundred dollars ($100) or less may be listed as miscellaneous expenses, by category, so long as the aggregate sum of all miscellaneous expenses is less than five thousand dollars ($5,000); and

A list of all prize winners, including their names and addresses, of cash, goods or services valued at more than fifty dollars ($50.00) and the prize received.

In the case of an annual event held jointly by two (2) or more nonprofit organizations as provided in § 3-17-103(a)(4), the financial accounting filed pursuant to this section shall be based on the gross amount of money jointly received and shall, in addition to the applicable requirements of subsection (b) or (c), show the amount disbursed, or to be disbursed, to each participating nonprofit organization. Such organizations may file the same financial accounting; provided, that the signature requirements of subsection (e) are satisfied.

For events grossing fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or less, all financial accountings required by this section shall be signed by the chair, president or chief administrative officer of the nonprofit organization and the preparer of the report, or, if the chair, president or chief administrative officer is the preparer of the report, by such person and by one additional officer of the nonprofit organization. For events grossing more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), all financial accountings required by this section shall be signed by the chair, president or chief administrative officer of the nonprofit organization and the preparer of the report. Such persons shall certify under oath and subject to criminal penalties, including perjury, that the information contained in the report is a true and accurate accounting of the funds received and expended during operation of the annual event.

A nonprofit organization that has received authorization to conduct an annual event, or conduct an annual event at multiple locations, may, at the discretion of the organization, cancel an annual event, or, if authorized at multiple locations, cancel a location of the annual event; provided, that:

An affidavit from the nonprofit organization's chair, president or chief administrative officer is filed with the secretary and the chief law enforcement officer of the county or municipality stating that the annual event, or a location of a multiple location annual event, is cancelled, and the nature of the cancellation, within ten (10) calendar days of the decision to cancel the event or location. Such cancellation shall be posted on the web site of the secretary. Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, if a single location annual event is cancelled, no other notice to the chief law enforcement officer of the county or municipality or a financial accounting shall be required, except as provided in subdivision (f)(1)(B); if a location of a multiple location annual event is cancelled, no other notice to the chief law enforcement officer of the county or municipality of the cancelled location is required; and

If cancellation occurs after the commencement of the sale of tickets, shares, chances or similar records, a full refund is offered for at least ninety (90) days following cancellation; provided, that if a location of a multiple location annual event is cancelled, only tickets, shares, chances or similar records for the cancelled location shall be required to be offered for at least ninety (90) days following cancellation. If a different value level or tiered pricing annual event is cancelled, any refund shall be for either the actual amount received by the organization as evinced by the record of each sale or, if such record is lost or destroyed, the highest value level or tiered price charged on a per ticket, share, chance or other similar record basis. A nonprofit organization shall give reasonable public notice of cancellation in the area in which tickets, shares, chances or similar records were sold, including the terms of the refund offered. Such terms shall be included in the affidavit required pursuant to subdivision (f)(1)(A), including a mailing or physical address to submit a refund claim; and, within ninety (90) days of cancellation of an annual event, or a location of a multiple location annual event, the organization shall file an accounting of tickets sold, refunds made and ticket proceeds remaining with the secretary and the chief law enforcement officer of the county or municipality. Any remaining ticket proceeds shall be used in furtherance of the charitable purposes or programs described in § 3-17-104(e)(6) of the organization's annual event application.

No annual event cancelled pursuant to this subsection (f) may be conducted during the annual event period. No multiple location annual event for which a location is cancelled pursuant to this subsection (f) may be conducted at such cancelled location during the annual event period.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, for authorized annual events whose gross revenue does not actually exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), the organization shall file a financial accounting, on a form prescribed by the secretary, including the following:

The gross amount of money received from the annual event;

The amount expended for prizes and administrative costs; and

The amount of money disbursed, or to be disbursed, to the charitable programs or purposes of the nonprofit organization.

[Deleted by 2018 amendment.]

Acts 2004, ch. 476, § 2; 2005, ch. 207, § 16; 2007, ch. 18, §§ 11, 12; 2014, ch. 699, §§ 17-24, 26; 2015, ch. 134, § 17; 2018, ch. 584, §§ 5, 6.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 476, § 13 provided that the provisions of the act shall not be construed to be an appropriation of funds and no funds shall be obligated or expended pursuant to the act unless such funds are specifically appropriated by the general appropriations act.

Acts 2014, ch. 699, § 27 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall not be construed as rescinding authorization, prohibiting or otherwise altering the requirements for annual events authorized by the One Hundred Eighth General Assembly for the annual event period beginning July 1, 2013, and ending June 30, 2014, and the annual event period beginning July 1, 2014, and ending June 30, 2015.

Acts 2014, ch. 699, § 28 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to annual event applications submitted, and annual events authorized, on and after July 1, 2014.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment added (a)(2); substituted “fifty thousand dollars ($50,000)” for “thirty thousand dollars ($30,000)” in the introductory paragraph of (b) and in the first and second sentences of (e); substituted “§3-17-104(e)(6)” for “§3-17-104(a)(19)” at the end of (b)(3) and (c) and near the end of the last sentence in (f)(1)(B); added the second sentence in (f)(1)(B); and, in (g), substituted “whose gross revenue does not actually exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000),” for “conducted pursuant to applications filed under §§3-17-103(f) and3-17-104(e),” in the introductory language of (1), and substituted “submitted contemporaneously with an updated financial accounting report prepared in accordance with the financial accounting requirements of subsections (b)-(e)” for “submitted with the financial accounting report” at the end of (2)(A).

The 2015 amendment substituted “nonprofit” for “501(c)(3)” throughout the section.

The 2018 amendment added the second and third sentences in (a)(1); and deleted former (g)(2) which read: “(2)(A) If the secretary determines that the gross revenue reported in subdivision (g)(1) exceeds five thousand dollars ($5,000), the nonprofit organization shall remit to the secretary the full application fee as required pursuant to §3-17-104(c)(2), less the reduced fee remitted with the annual event application. Any payment to be remitted pursuant to this subdivision (g)(2)(A) shall be submitted contemporaneously with an updated financial accounting report prepared in accordance with the financial accounting requirements of subsections (b)-(e).“(B) An organization required to remit an additional payment pursuant to subdivision (g)(2)(A) shall, in the next annual event application period, pay the full application fee as required pursuant to §3-17-104(c)(2).”

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 699, § 28. July 1, 2014.

Acts 2015, ch. 134, § 28. April 14, 2015.

Acts 2018, ch. 584, § 7. March 20, 2018.

3-17-107. Public records — Release of information.

Applications, reports, and all other documents and information required to be filed under this chapter, or by the secretary, shall be public records in the office of the secretary. The secretary, in the secretary's discretion, may compile, summarize, publish, or otherwise release to the public any information contained in applications and any other documents filed with or received by the secretary under this chapter.

Acts 2004, ch. 476, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 476, § 13 provided that the provisions of the act shall not be construed to be an appropriation of funds and no funds shall be obligated or expended pursuant to the act unless such funds are specifically appropriated by the general appropriations act.

3-17-108. Recordkeeping.

Every nonprofit organization subject to the provisions of this chapter and the rules and regulations prescribed by the secretary, shall keep:

True and accurate fiscal records including, but not limited to, all income and expenses; and

True and accurate records regarding the conduct of any annual event, including records of any documents, information, notices, or applications required to be prepared or filed pursuant to this chapter. Unless otherwise provided, such records shall be retained for a period of at least five (5) years after the event date to which they relate.

Upon request and at a reasonable time and place within Tennessee, such records, as well as any other records regarding annual events within this state, shall be made available to the secretary, the state and local government committee of the senate and the state government committee of the house of representatives, the attorney general and reporter, or an appropriate district attorney general for inspection.

Acts 2004, ch. 476, § 2; 2011, ch. 410, § 8; 2013, ch. 236, § 64; 2015, ch. 134, § 18.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 476, § 13 provided that the provisions of the act shall not be construed to be an appropriation of funds and no funds shall be obligated or expended pursuant to the act unless such funds are specifically appropriated by the general appropriations act.

For the Preamble to the act concerning the prohibition against establishment of a special committee if there is a standing committee on the same subject, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 410.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “nonprofit” for “501(c)(3)” in (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 134, § 28. April 14, 2015.

3-17-109. Restrictions on purchase of tickets, shares, chances, or similar records — Restrictions on prizes and awards.

No ticket, share, chance or similar record shall be purchased by and no prize or award shall be paid to:

Any member of the board of directors of a nonprofit organization authorized by the general assembly to operate an annual event for such organization;

Any officer or employee of a nonprofit organization authorized by the general assembly to operate an annual event for such organization;

Any member of the immediate family of any person described in subdivisions (a)(1) or (a)(2) residing as a member of the same household in the principal place of residence of any such person;

Any member of the general assembly during such member's term of office as a member of the general assembly; or

The secretary or any employee of the secretary during the secretary's term of office and such employee's term of employment with the secretary.

No ticket, share, chance or similar record for any specific authorized annual event shall be purchased by, and no prize or award shall be paid to:

Any person providing printing services, telephone services and any records, devices or other gaming related supplies to conduct such specific authorized annual event;

Any officer, employee, agent or subcontractor of any person described in subdivision (b)(1); or

Any member of the immediate family of any person described in subdivisions (b)(1) or (b)(2) residing as a member of the same household in the principal place of residence of any such person.

For the purposes of this section, “immediate family” means a spouse, child, step-child, brother, sister, son-in-law, daughter-in-law, parent or grandparent.

No ticket, share, chance or similar record for any specific authorized annual event shall be purchased by, and no prize or award shall be paid to, any individual providing prizes or any member of the immediate family of any individual providing prizes residing as a member of the same household in the principal place of residence of such individual.

If an ineligible person is selected to win a prize or award, the organization shall not disburse the prize or award to the ineligible person but shall select a different person to whom the prize or award shall be paid. Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, the organization shall select a new winner within thirty (30) calendar days of the date on which the organization received notice of the ineligible winner.

Acts 2004, ch. 476, § 2; 2005, ch. 207, §§ 19, 20; 2015, ch. 134, § 19; 2016, ch. 821, § 6; 2018, ch. 568, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 476, § 13 provided that the provisions of the act shall not be construed to be an appropriation of funds and no funds shall be obligated or expended pursuant to the act unless such funds are specifically appropriated by the general appropriations act.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “nonprofit” for “501(c)(3)” preceding “organization” twice in (a).

The 2016 amendment added (e).

The 2018 amendment, in the last sentence of (e), substituted “the organization shall” for “an organization may” and substituted “date on which the organization received notice of the ineligible winner” for “date of the annual event” at the end.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 134, § 28. April 14, 2015.

Acts 2016, ch. 821, § 8. July 1, 2016.

Acts 2018, ch. 568, § 3. March 16, 2018.

3-17-110. Name of organization on ticket, share, chance or similar record — Method of payment of prizes and awards — Limitations on prices and awards.

The ticket, share, chance or other similar record shall bear on its face the name of the nonprofit organization on whose behalf the event is being conducted.

All cash prizes or awards exceeding fifty dollars ($50.00) shall be paid by check from a designated account of the organization to a named individual. In the case of non-cash prizes or awards, payment shall be in the form of goods or services and, if applicable, by an appropriate legal instrument including, but not limited to, deeds, titles and gift certificates. Checks or other legal instruments payable to “cash” or “bearer” are expressly prohibited.

For single location annual events, the total value of all prizes awarded per annual event shall not exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000); provided, that such limitation shall not apply to prizes of real property.

For multiple location annual events, the total value of all prizes awarded per annual event location shall not exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000); provided, that such limitation shall not apply to prizes of real property.

Notwithstanding subdivisions (c)(1) and (2), for annual events conducted by a nonprofit organization that does not intend to raise gross revenue from the annual event exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000), the total value of all prizes awarded per annual event shall not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

Authorized nonprofit organizations offering a prize of real property pursuant to subsection (c) may offer a cash equivalent prize not to exceed the fair market value of the real property; provided, that any such cash equivalent prize shall be disclosed in the rules of the specific annual event prior to the sale of any ticket, share, chance or other similar record for such annual event and, if a cash equivalent prize is awarded, shall comply with subsection (b).

Acts 2004, ch. 476, § 2; 2005, ch. 207, §§ 17, 21; 2014, ch. 699, § 25; 2015, ch. 134, § 20.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 476, § 13 provided that the provisions of the act shall not be construed to be an appropriation of funds and no funds shall be obligated or expended pursuant to the act unless such funds are specifically appropriated by the general appropriations act.

Acts 2014, ch. 699, § 27 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall not be construed as rescinding authorization, prohibiting or otherwise altering the requirements for annual events authorized by the One Hundred Eighth General Assembly for the annual event period beginning July 1, 2013, and ending June 30, 2014, and the annual event period beginning July 1, 2014, and ending June 30, 2015.

Acts 2014, ch. 699, § 28 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to annual event applications submitted, and annual events authorized, on and after July 1, 2014.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment rewrote (c)(3) which read: “Notwithstanding subdivisions (c)(1) and (2), for annual events conducted pursuant to applications filed under the provisions of §§3-17-103(f) and3-17-104(e), the total value of all prizes awarded per annual event shall not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).”

The 2015 amendment substituted “nonprofit” for “501(c)(3)” throughout the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 699, § 28. July 1, 2014.

Acts 2015, ch. 134, § 28. April 14, 2015.

3-17-111. Disqualification.

Any person who is convicted of a violation of §39-16-702, §39-16-703, or title 39, chapter 17, parts 5 and 6 shall be permanently disqualified from submitting an annual event application.

Acts 2004, ch. 476, § 2; 2007, ch. 18, § 13.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 476, § 13 provided that the provisions of the act shall not be construed to be an appropriation of funds and no funds shall be obligated or expended pursuant to the act unless such funds are specifically appropriated by the general appropriations act.

3-17-112. Preemption.

The general assembly, by enacting this chapter, intends to preempt any other regulation of the area covered by this chapter. No political subdivision or agency may enact or enforce a law, ordinance, resolution or regulation that regulates or prohibits any conduct in the area covered by this chapter.

Acts 2004, ch. 476, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 476, § 13 provided that the provisions of the act shall not be construed to be an appropriation of funds and no funds shall be obligated or expended pursuant to the act unless such funds are specifically appropriated by the general appropriations act.